Washington statutes.
RCW 18.84.030

Registration or certificate required.

No person may practice radiologic technology without being registered or certified under this chapter, unless that person is a licensed practitioner as defined in RCW 18.84.020(5). A person represents himself or herself to the public as a certified radiologic technologist when that person adopts or uses a title or description of services that incorporates one or more of the following items or designations:

(1) Certified radiologic technologist or CRT, for persons so certified under this chapter;

(2) Certified radiologic therapy technologist, CRTT, or CRT, for persons certified in the therapeutic field;

(3) Certified radiologic diagnostic technologist, CRDT, or CRT, for persons certified in the diagnostic field;

(4) Certified nuclear medicine technologist, CNMT, or CRT, for persons certified as nuclear medicine technologists;

(5) Certified magnetic resonance imaging technologist, CMRIT, or CRT, for persons certified as magnetic resonance imaging technologists; or

(6) Certified radiologist assistant or CRA for persons certified as radiologist assistants.

[ 2024 c 94 s 3; 2008 c 246 s 3; 1991 c 222 s 3; 1987 c 412 s 2.]